North Dakota, session 69, SB2327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-01.1-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
4.1-01.1-07. Agriculture diversification and development fund - Continuing appropriation.
1. There is created in the state treasury the agriculture diversification and development fund. The
fund consists of all moneys transferred to the fund by the legislative assembly, interest upon
moneys in the fund, and payments of interest and principal on loans made from the fund.
Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the Bank of North Dakota on a continuing basis for
loan disbursements and administrative costs pursuant to this section, and moneys in the fund
are appropriated to the agriculture commissioner on a continuing basis for grants pursuant to
this section and section 4.1-01-27. The agriculture diversification and development committee
shall designate the amount available from the fund for loans, interest rate buydowns, and
grants.
2. Loans, interest rate buydowns, or grants under subsections 3 and 4 may be issued from the
fund to support new or expanding value-added agriculture businesses that demonstrate
financial feasibility, enhance profitability for farmers and ranchers, create jobs, and grow the
state's economy. Grants under section 4.1-01-27 may be issued from the fund for
infrastructure improvements necessary for the development or expansion of new or existing
value-added agriculture businesses. Value-added agriculture businesses include food
production or processing facilities; feed or pet food processing facilities; commodity
processing facilities; agriculture product manufacturers; and animal agriculture production
facilities, including swine, poultry, dairy, and feed lot production facilities.
3. The Bank of North Dakota shall develop policies for loans and interest rate buydowns from the
fund in consultation with the agriculture diversification and development committee. The Bank
shall review loan applications. To be eligible for a loan under this section, an entity shall agree
to provide the Bank with information as requested. The Bank may develop policies for loan
participation with local financial institutions. The Bank shall deposit in the fund all principal and
interest paid on the outstanding loans. The Bank may use a portion of the interest paid as a
servicing fee to pay for administrative costs, which may not exceed one-half of one percent of
the amount of the outstanding loans. The fund must be audited annually pursuant to section
6-09-29, and the cost of the audit must be paid from the fund.
4. The agricultural diversification and development committee shall develop policies for grants
from the fund to support new or expanding value-added agriculture businesses, including
eligibility criteria, maximum grant amounts, and reporting requirements. Based on
recommendations from the agricultural diversification and development committee, the
agriculture commissioner shall distribute the grant funding.
5. The agriculture diversification and development committee may use funding available in the
agriculture diversification and development fund for in - state travel, per diem, and related costs

S. B. NO. 2327 - PAGE 2
of administering grants under this section. The agriculture commissioner may reimburse
agriculture diversification and development committee members for in - state travel, per diem ,
and related costs incurred associated with the program as authorized under subsection 2 of
section 4.1 - 01.1 - 08 .
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-01.1-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
4.1-01.1-08. Agriculture diversification and development committee.
1. The agriculture diversification and development committee consists of eleven members, five of
whom must be appointed by the commissioner for terms of two years each, arranged so that
two terms expire in odd-numbered years and three terms expire in even-numbered years.
a. Four of the members appointed by the commissioner must be actively engaged in
farming in this state and the fifth member appointed by the commissioner must be
actively engaged in agribusiness in this state.
b. The governor shall appoint one member for a term of two years which expires in
odd-numbered years.
c. The member appointed by the governor must be actively engaged in business in this
state.
d. The remaining committee members must consist of:
(1) One representative from the independent community banks of North Dakota;
(2) One representative from the North Dakota bankers association;
(3) The commissioner of commerce or the commissioner's designee;
(4) The president of North Dakota state university or the president's designee; and
(5) The agriculture commissioner or the commissioner's designee.
e. The committee shall elect one of its members as chairman.
2. The agriculture diversification and development committee shall develop guidelines for the
grants, including eligibility criteria and reporting requirements. The guidelines must include
priority for businesses with a majority of the ownership comprised of North Dakota residents.
The agriculture diversification and development committee shall review grant applications and
make funding determinations. Members of the committee are entitled to be reimbursed for
expenses incurred in the performance of their duties, in the same manner as other state
officials are reimbursed, in accordance with sections 44 - 08 - 04 and 54 - 06 - 09. If not otherwise
employed by the state of North Dakota, members of the committee are entitled to receive per
diem compensation of one hundred thirty-five dollars for each day of attending meetings and
performing other duties relating to official business of the committee.
SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - TRANSFER TO AGRICULTURE DIVERSIFICATION AND
DEVELOPMENT FUND. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state
treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $15,000,000, which the office of management and
budget shall transfer to the agriculture diversification and development fund, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.

S. B. NO. 2327 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2327.
Senate Vote: Yeas 42 Nays 4 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 74 Nays 17 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State